Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1095.01
Long-Term Care Partnership Program; established; Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

The Long-Term Care Partnership Program is established. The program shall be administered by the Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with federal requirements on state long-term care partnership programs. In order to implement the program, the department shall file a state plan amendment with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to the requirements set forth in 42 U.S.C. 1396p(b), as such section existed on March 1, 2006.

Laws 2006, LB 965, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 272.